California, session 20252026, AB2010.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4854 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4854. (a) All premises where veterinary medicine, veterinary dentistry, or veterinary surgery is being practiced, and all instruments, apparatus and apparel used in connection with those practices, shall be kept clean and sanitary at all times, and shall conform to those minimum standards established by the board.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, high-quality, high-volume spay or neuter services performed either in a registered veterinary premises premises, or by a veterinarian employed or contracted with a veterinary premises in a temporary setting, shall not be required to comply take place in a facility that complies with any of the following standards:(1) A requirement for a separate room that is reserved for aseptic surgical procedures that require aseptic preparation.(2) A prohibition on open shelving in the area in which the aseptic surgical sterilization procedure is performed.(3) A requirement for equipment for viewing radiographs.(c) For purposes of this section, “high-quality, high-volume spay or neuter services” means the aseptic surgical sterilization by a veterinarian, including the supervision by the veterinarian of presurgical preparation and recovery of the animals, of 20 or more dogs, cats, or rabbits, or any combination thereof, within 12 consecutive hours.